District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.10

Transfer of employees.

(a)

The employees of United Medical Center shall be transferred to the Corporation with the same rights and obligations they enjoyed as employees of the United Medical Center.

(b)

The employees transferred from the United Medical Center to the Corporation shall not be governed by Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-601.01 et seq.], or its implementing regulations and shall not enjoy any rights, benefits, or obligations afforded by Chapter 6 of Title 1.

History

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5121, 58 DCR 6226